Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2580XC (5) 91 je/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 96.1A, subsection 36, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 36. âTaxable wagesâ means an amount of wages upon which 3 an employer is required to contribute based upon wages which 4 that have been paid in this state during a calendar year to 5 an individual by an employer or the employerâs predecessor , 6 in this state or another state which extends a like comity to 7 this state, with respect to employment , upon which the employer 8 is required to contribute, which equals the greater of the 9 following: 10 a. Sixty-six and two-thirds For employers in the first 11 through eighth benefit ratio ranks, seventeen percent of the 12 statewide average weekly wage which that was used during the 13 previous calendar year to determine maximum weekly benefit 14 amounts, multiplied by fifty-two and rounded to the next 15 highest multiple of one hundred dollars. 16 b. For employers in the ninth benefit ratio rank, 17 fifty-eight percent of the statewide average weekly wage that 18 was used during the previous calendar year to determine maximum 19 weekly benefit amounts, multiplied by fifty-two and rounded to 20 the next highest multiple of one hundred dollars. 21 b. c. That portion of wages subject to a tax under a 22 federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken 23 for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment 24 compensation fund. 25 Sec. 2. Section 96.7, subsection 2, paragraph c, 26 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as 27 follows: 28 (1) A nonconstruction contributory employer newly subject 29 to this chapter shall pay contributions at the rate specified 30 in the twelfth fourth benefit ratio rank but not less than 31 one percent until the end of the calendar year in which the 32 employerâs account has been chargeable with benefits for 33 twelve consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the 34 computation date. 35 -1- LSB 2580XC (5) 91 je/js 1/ 6 S.F. _____ (2) A construction or landscaping contributory employer, 1 as defined under rules adopted by the department pursuant to 2 chapter 17A , which that is newly subject to this chapter shall 3 pay contributions at the rate specified in the twenty-first 4 ninth benefit ratio rank until the end of the calendar year in 5 which the employerâs account has been chargeable with benefits 6 for twelve consecutive calendar quarters. 7 Sec. 3. Section 96.7, subsection 2, paragraph d, 8 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 9 (1) The current reserve fund ratio is computed by dividing 10 the total funds available for payment of benefits, on the 11 computation date or on August 15 following the computation 12 date if the total funds available for payment of benefits is a 13 higher amount on August 15, by the total wages paid in covered 14 employment excluding reimbursable employment wages during the 15 first four calendar quarters of the five calendar quarters 16 year immediately preceding the computation date. However, 17 in computing the current reserve fund ratio, beginning July 18 1, 2007, one hundred fifty million dollars shall be added to 19 the total funds available for payment of benefits on each 20 computation date. 21 Sec. 4. Section 96.7, subsection 2, paragraph d, 22 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 23 amended by striking the subparagraph division. 24 Sec. 5. Section 96.7, subsection 2, paragraph d, 25 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), Code 2025, is 26 amended by striking the subparagraph division and inserting in 27 lieu thereof the following: 28 (b) If the current reserve fund ratio: 29 Equals or But is The contribution rate 30 exceeds less than table in effect shall be 31 _______________________________________________________________ 32 ââ 0.50 A 33 0.50 0.90 B 34 0.90 1.30 C 35 -2- LSB 2580XC (5) 91 je/js 2/ 6 S.F. _____ 1.30 ââ D 1 Sec. 6. Section 96.7, subsection 2, paragraph d, 2 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (d), Code 2025, is 3 amended by striking the subparagraph division and inserting in 4 lieu thereof the following: 5 (d) Each employer qualified for an experience rating 6 shall be assigned a contribution rate for each rate year 7 that corresponds to the employerâs benefit ratio rank in the 8 contribution rate table effective for the rate year from the 9 following contribution rate tables. Each employerâs benefit 10 ratio rank shall be computed by listing all the employers by 11 increasing benefit ratios, from the lowest benefit ratio to the 12 highest benefit ratio and grouping the employers so listed into 13 nine separate ranks containing as nearly as possible fourteen 14 and twenty-nine hundredths percent of the total taxable wages, 15 excluding reimbursable employment wages, in the first six 16 ranks, and four and seventy-six hundredths percent of the total 17 taxable wages, excluding reimbursable employment wages, in 18 ranks seven, eight, and nine, paid in covered employment during 19 the four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the 20 computation date. If an employerâs taxable wages qualify the 21 employer for two separate benefit ratio ranks, the employer 22 shall be afforded the benefit ratio rank assigned the lower 23 contribution rate. Employers with identical benefit ratios 24 shall be assigned to the same benefit ratio rank. 25 Approximate Contribution Rate Tables 26 Benefit Cumulative 27 Ratio Taxable 28 Rank Payroll Limit A B C D 29 __________________________________________________________ 30 1 14.29% 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 31 2 28.58% 0.40 0.30 0.10 0.10 32 3 42.87% 1.20 0.80 0.40 0.20 33 4 57.16% 2.10 1.40 0.60 0.30 34 5 71.45% 3.60 2.40 1.10 0.50 35 -3- LSB 2580XC (5) 91 je/js 3/ 6 S.F. _____ 6 85.74% 5.40 4.10 1.90 0.90 1 7 90.50% 5.40 5.40 4.20 2.00 2 8 95.26% 5.40 5.40 5.40 2.80 3 9 100.00% 7.00 7.00 7.00 7.00 4 Sec. 7. EMPLOYER SAVINGS. Any savings an employer receives 5 as a result of this Act should be used for at least one of the 6 following purposes: 7 1. To pay for employee salaries or benefits. 8 2. To use as an alternative to unemployment benefits during 9 periods of seasonal unemployment. 10